District of Columbia statutes.
31-3303.08

Disclosure of information.

(a)

Any health insurer offering health insurance coverage to a small employer shall make a reasonable disclosure of the availability of information to such an employer, as part of its solicitation and sales materials, and upon request of such an employer, information concerning:

(1)

The provisions of such coverage concerning the health insurer’s right to change premium rates and the factors that may affect changes in premium rates;

(2)

The provisions of such coverage relating to renewability of coverage;

(3)

The provisions of such coverage relating to any preexisting condition exclusion; and

(4)

The benefits and premiums available under all health insurance coverage for which the employer is qualified.

(b)

A health insurer is not required under this subchapter to disclose any information that is proprietary and trade secret information.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 308, 45 DCR 8433
1981 Ed., § 35-1038.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.
See notes to § 31-3301.01.